Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-372
Capital stock association; application; contents.

Every corporation organized for and desiring to conduct a capital stock association shall make under oath and transmit to the department a complete detailed application, giving the name of the proposed capital stock association, a certified copy of the articles of incorporation, the names of the stockholders, the county, city, or village and the exact location within such city or village where such association is proposed to be located, the nature of the proposed capital stock association business, the proposed amounts of capital stock, surplus, and undivided profits, and the items of actual cash and property, as reported and approved at a meeting of the stockholders.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 17.